bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Дамско бельо > Оформящо облекло: Оформящи елементи за ръце и горна част на тялото; Бодита; Цели оформящи бодита; Гащи с висока талия; Оформящи камизоли и потници; Оформящи тесни рокли; Оформящи клинове; Оформящи талията корсети
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 女用貼身衣物 > 塑身衣: 手臂與上半身塑身衣; 連身衣; 連身塑身衣; 高腰三角褲; 塑身細肩帶與無袖上衣; 塑身襯裙; 大腿塑身褲; 束腰
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Đồ lót phụ nữ > Quần áo lót: Đồ định hình bắp tay và thân trên; Áo liền quần; Đồ lót định hình toàn thân; Quần lót cạp cao; Áo hai dây và áo ba lỗ định hình; Váy lót định hình; Đồ lót định hình thon gọn bắp đùi; Áo nịt bụng
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Underkläder > Formgivande plagg: Formande plagg för armar och överkropp; Body; Helkroppsformare; Trosor med hög midja; Formande linnen; Formande underklänningar; Lårformare; Midjeformare
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ランジェリー > 補正下着: アーム＆上半身補正下着; ボディスーツ; フルボディ補正; ハイウエストショーツ; 補正キャミソール＆タンクトップ; 補正スリップ; 太ももスリマー; ウエストニッパー
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Lingerie > Vestuário modelador: Modeladores de braços e tronco; Bodies; Modeladores de corpo inteiro; Cuecas de cintura subida; Camisolas interiores e tops modeladores; Combinações modeladoras; Modelador de coxa; Adelgaçante de cintura
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Žensko donje rublje > Odjeća za oblikovanje: Oblikovatelji za ruke i gornji dio tijela; Bodiji; Donje rublje za oblikovanje tijela; Gaćice s visokim strukom; Majice i potkošulje za oblikovanje tijela; Haljine za oblikovanje; Donje rublje za oblikovanje bedara; Steznici
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Lingerie > Sous-vêtements gainants: Gaines pour bras et haut du corps; Bodies; Formes du corps complet; Slips taille haute; Caracos et débardeurs gainants; Fonds de robe sculptants; Amincissants pour les cuisses; Serres-taille
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > ชุดชั้นใน > ชุดกระชับส่วน: ชุดกระชับต้นแขนและลำตัวส่วนบน; บอดี้สูท; ชุดกระชับสัดส่วนทั่วร่างกาย; กางเกงชั้นในเอวสูง; เสื้อสายเดี่ยวและเสื้อกล้ามกระชับสัดส่วน; กระโปรงซับในกระชับสัดส่วน; ชุดลดต้นขา; ชุดลดเอว
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Dameundertøy > Shapewear: Formende plagg for armer og overkropp; Bodysuits; Helkroppsformer; Truser med høy midje; Formende singleter og stroppetopper; Formende underkjoler; Lårslankere; Midjestrammere
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Spodnje perilo > Oblačila za oblikovanje postave: Oblikovalniki rok in zgornjega dela telesa; Bodiji; Oblačila za oblikovanje postave; Spodnje hlačke z visokim pasom; Oblikovalne majice brez rokavov in brezrokavniki; Oblikovalne spodnje obleke; Stezniki za stegna; Stezniki za pas
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Alusasut > Muotoilevat alusasut: Käsivarsien ja ylävartalon muotoilijat; Bodyt; Koko kehon muotoilu; Korkeavyötäröiset alushousut; Muotoilevat alustopit; Muotoilevat alusmekot; Reisien muotoilu; Vyötärön muotoilu
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Spodná bielizeň > Sťahovacia bielizeň: Tvarovače ramien a hornej časti tela; Body; Celotelová sťahovacia bielizeň; Nohavičky s vysokým pásom; Tvarovacie tielka; Tvarovacie návleky; Sťahovacie bermudy; Korzetové pásy
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Dámské prádlo > Tvarovací prádlo: Tvarovací prádlo na paže a horní část těla; Body; Celotělové; Kalhotky s vysokým pasem; Tvarovací košilky a tílka; Tvarovací spodničky; Stahovací kalhotky; Stahovací pásy
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Lingerie > Cinta modeladora: Modeladores de braço e tronco; Macacões; Cintas de corpo inteiro; Calcinhas de cintura alta; Camisetes e regatas modeladoras; Anáguas modeladoras; Redutores de coxa; Cintas abdominais
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 란제리 > 보정 속옷: 팔 및 상체 보정 속옷; 바디수트; 전신 보정 속옷; 하이웨이스트 브리프; 체형 보정용 캐미솔 및 탱크톱; 보정용 슬립; 허벅지 보정 속옷; 허리 보정 신처
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Lencería > Fajas reductoras: Moldeadores de brazos y parte superior del cuerpo; Bodis; Fajas de cuerpo completo; Calzoncillos de talle alto; Camisolas y camisetas sin mangas moldeadoras; Vestidos interiores moldeadores; Moldeadores de muslos; Ceñidores de cintura
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Lingerie > Corrigerende kleding: Corrigerende kleding voor armen en bovenlichaam; Bodysuits; Volledige lichaamsvormen; Hoog getailleerde slips; Corrigerende hemdjes en tanktops; Corrigerende onderjurken; Dijbeenafslankers; Taillecinchers
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Bielizny > Bielizna modelująca: Bielizna modelująca ramiona i górne partie ciała; Body; Pełne kształty; Figi z wysokim stanem; Modelujące koszulki i topy; Halki modelujące; Bielizna wyszczuplająca uda; Gorsety typu waist cincher
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Lenjerie > Lenjerie modelatoare: Modelatoare pentru brațe și partea superioară a corpului; Costume de baie întregi; Compleuri întregi; Chiloți cu talie înaltă; Bustiere și maiouri modelatoare; Combinezoane modelatoare; Lenjerie modelatoare coapse; Lenjerie modelatoare talie
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Εσώρουχα > Shapewear: Εσώρουχα σύσφιξης χεριών και άνω κορμού; Κορμάκια; Ολόσωμα ρούχα; Σλιπ με ψηλή μέση; Καμισόλ και τοπ σύσφιξης; Κομπινεζόν σύσφιξης; Κορσέδες μηρών; Ζώνες σύσφιξης μέσης
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Женское белье > Корректирующее белье: Корректирующее белье для рук и верхней части тела; Боди; Комбидресс; Трусы с высокой посадкой; Корректирующие майки и топы; Корректирующие комбинации; Утягивающие шорты; Корсажи
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 女式内衣 > 塑身内衣: 手臂和上半身塑身衣; 连体衣; 全身塑形; 高腰三角裤; 塑身吊带衫和背心; 塑身衬裙; 瘦腿裤; 束腰
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Lingerie > Shapewear: Formende tøj til arme og overkrop; Bodyer; Fulde kropsformer; Højtaljede trusser; Formende toppe og undertrøjer; Formende underkjoler; Lårslankere; Taljeremme
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Apatinis trikotažas > Formuojantys drabužiai: Rankų ir viršutinės kūno dalies formavimo priemonės; Bodžiukai; Visą kūną formuojantys drabužiai; Trumpikės aukštu juosmeniu; Formuojantys marškinėliai ir palaidinės be rankovių; Formuojantys pasijoniai; Šlaunis apspaudžiančios trumpikės; Korsetai
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Lingerie > Shapewear: Arm & Upper Body Shapers; Bodysuits; Full Body Shapes; High Waisted Briefs; Shaping Camisoles & Tank Tops; Shaping Slips; Thigh Slimmers; Waist Cinchers
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Dessous > Shapewear: Arm- & Oberkörperformer; Bodys; Ganzkörper-Shapewear; Slips mit hoher Taille; Figurformende Unterhemden & Tanktops; Figurformende Unterkleider; Thigh Slimmer; Taillenkorsetts
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Fehérneműk > Alakformáló ruházat: Kar- és felsőtest-formálók; Body-k; Teljes testformák; Magas derekú alsónadrágok; Alakformáló trikók és ujjatlan felsők; Alakformáló alsóruhák; Combkarcsúsítók; Derékformálók
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Kadın İç Çamaşırları > Şekillendirici Kıyafetler: Kol ve üst vücut şekillendiriciler; Bodysuit; Tam Vücut Şekilleri; Yüksek Bel Külot; Şekillendirici kaşkorseler ve atletler; Şekillendirici kombinezonlar; Bacak İncelticiler; Bel Korseleri
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Lingerie > Indumenti modellanti: Modellanti per braccia e busto; Body; Body contenitivi modellanti; Slip a vita alta; Canotte e top modellanti; Sottovesti modellanti; Indumenti dimagranti per le cosce; Guaine per la vita